Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.800

Foreign trade zones—Legislative finding, intent.

It is the finding of the legislature that foreign trade zones serve an important public purpose by the creation of employment opportunities within the state and that the establishment of zones designed to accomplish this purpose is to be encouraged. It is the further intent of the legislature that the department of trade and economic development provide assistance to entities planning to apply to the United States for permission to establish such zones.

[ 1985 c 466 s 43; 1977 ex.s. c 196 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1985 c 466: See notes following RCW 43.31.125.

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 196: See note following RCW 24.46.010.